Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Contracts with United States

Cross references. —

As to construction contracts of United States, relative to irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-601

through

41-7-603

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.

§ 41-9-501.
Qualifications of districts as prerequisites to contracting.

Except as otherwise provided in this act [§§

41-9-501

through

41-9-504

], drainage districts organized under the provisions of chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, and contracting with the United States under authority of this act, shall be organized, administered and have the same powers, duties and obligations as provided for in said chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920 and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 94, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-910; C.S. 1945, § 71-1804; W.S. 1957, § 41-470.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

§ 41-9-502.
When district authorized to enter into contract.

Any drainage district organized under the provisions of chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, through its commissioners, shall have power to enter into contracts with the United States for the construction, operation and maintenance of any drainage or other works authorized to be done under the provisions of said statutes and authorized under any act of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted, providing for or permitting such a contract on the part of the United States, after said contract has been first submitted to the qualified electors of said district at an election held for that purpose, and at which a majority of the qualified electors present and voting has voted in favor of making such a contract.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 94, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-907; C.S. 1945, § 71-1801; W.S. 1957, § 41-471.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

§ 41-9-503.
Securing of district indebtedness due to contract.

The commissioners may secure the indebtedness incurred by the district in such contract as provided for in W.S.

41-9-502

, by issuing bonds of the district in such form, terms and denominations as may be fixed by the secretary of the interior in carrying out the provisions of any act of congress heretofore or hereafter enacted providing for or permitting such a contract on the part of the United States and the acceptance and deposit or sale of bonds of the district by the United States; said bonds may be delivered to the United States and held by it or, when deemed desirable or when the appraised value of the land in the district is double the bonded indebtedness, sold by the United States, and the net proceeds received from the sale of said bonds applied to the liquidation of the contract indebtedness of the district to the United States.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 94, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-908; C.S. 1945, § 71-1802; W.S. 1957, § 41-472.

§ 41-9-504.
Unentered public lands as majority of district; appointment of commissioners; term; removal; subsequent appointment or election.

When a majority of the lands within the district are unentered public lands, a majority of the commissioners of the district, who shall be residents of the state, may be appointed by the secretary of the interior, and shall be subject to removal from office by him and any vacancy so created may be filled by further appointment by the secretary of the interior. Commissioners thus appointed by the secretary of the interior shall hold office until such time that the unentered public lands within the district constitute a minority of the total area, after which they shall be appointed or elected as otherwise provided by this chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto; if a majority of the commissioners of the district are so appointed by the secretary of the interior, then the remaining commissioners shall be appointed or elected at large within the entire drainage district for terms of two (2) years each, which terms, however, shall be limited to and expire on the first Tuesday in July next following the date when the unentered public lands within the district constitute less than a majority of the total acreage within the district, after which the commissioners shall be appointed or elected in the same manner and for the same terms as provided for in the case of first appointment or election of commissioners under the said statutes.

History.

Laws 1923, ch. 94, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-909; C.S. 1945, § 71-1803; W.S. 1957, § 41-473.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.